Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201767-448.02
Domestic limited liability partnership; conversion into domestic limited liability company or foreign limited liability company; procedure; notice to holder of security interest.

A domestic limited liability partnership may convert into a domestic limited liability company pursuant to sections 21-170 to 21-184 and may convert into a foreign limited liability company in accordance with this section and the applicable law of the state of formation of such foreign limited liability company. In each case, the conversion of a domestic limited liability partnership into such limited liability company shall be made pursuant to a plan of conversion setting forth the information required in section 21-175 and such information required pursuant to the statute under which such conversion shall be effected. Unless otherwise provided in its organizational documents, a plan of conversion shall be approved by the domestic limited liability partnership by partners who own in the aggregate more than fifty percent of the interests in the profits of such limited liability partnership. Notwithstanding such approval, at any time before the articles of conversion are filed, a plan of conversion may be terminated or amended pursuant to a provision for such termination or amendment contained in the plan of conversion. Within ten business days after the articles of conversion take effect, a domestic limited liability partnership converting into a domestic limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company shall send written notice of such conversion to the last-known address of any holder of a security interest in collateral of such limited liability partnership.

Laws 2016, LB1050, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB99, § 9.